District of Columbia statutes.
46-359.03

Applicability.

This chapter applies to proceedings begun on or after February 27, 2016, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 903, 63 DCR 222